Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3630
Fee; when not applicable.

The fee imposed by section 2-3623 shall not apply to the sale of corn to the federal government for the ultimate use of consumption by the people of the United States when the State of Nebraska is prohibited from imposing such fee by the Constitution of the United States and laws enacted pursuant thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 30.